Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB528.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 167.017 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The superintendent of the Kentucky School for the Deaf shall be appointed by
the chief state school officer. The appointment shall be made upon
recommendation of a search committee which shall be appointed by the
Kentucky School for the Deaf Board[ of Education] whenever appointment of
a superintendent becomes necessary.
(b) The appointment of the superintendent shall be made within thirty (30) days
of the recommendation of the search committee, unless the chief state
school officer provides written notification to the Kentucky Board of
Education and the Kentucky School for the Deaf Board of the reason for
the failure to make the appointment within the allotted time.
(c) The superintendent of the Kentucky School for the Deaf shall carry out all
duties assigned to him or her by the chief state school officer, in
consultation with the Kentucky School for the Deaf Board, for the operation
of the Kentucky School for the Deaf, including those duties typically
reserved for a school principal when the Kentucky School for the Deaf is
without a principal.
(2) (a) The search committee for the superintendent of the Kentucky School for the
Deaf shall be appointed within thirty (30) days of receiving notice of a
vacancy and shall consist of the representative of the[ State] Department of
Education selected by the chief state school officer, one (1) representative of
the Kentucky Association of the Deaf, Inc., one (1) representative of the
Kentucky School for the Deaf Alumni Association, Inc., one (1)
representative of the Kentucky School for the Deaf faculty, one (1) parent of a
student at the Kentucky School for the Deaf, and one (1) representative of the
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 1/28/2026 1:47 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1750
Kentucky School for the Deaf [advisory ]Board.
(b) The search committee's recommendation shall[must] be approved by a
majority of the Kentucky School for the Deaf Board[ of Education] members.
(c) In making its recommendation, the search committee shall prioritize
candidates who are willing to reside near the Kentucky School for the Deaf
facilities and commit to full-time employment as superintendent of the
Kentucky School for the Deaf.
(3) The superintendent of the Kentucky School for the Deaf may be removed from
office by the Kentucky School for the Deaf Board[ of Education] only by a
majority vote of the Kentucky School for the Deaf Board[ of Education].
(4) A current or former employee of the Kentucky Department of Education or a
current or former member of the Kentucky Board of Education shall not be
eligible for consideration of appointment as the superintendent of the Kentucky
School for the Deaf for a period of one (1) year after the date of:
(a) Leaving the position or termination of employment; or
(b) The term of office to which the member of the board was appointed expires.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (4) of this section, this section shall not be construed
to prohibit a binding contract for the employment of a superintendent for the
Kentucky School for the Deaf entered into prior to the effective date of this Act.
Section 2. KRS 167.037 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby[shall be] established the[a] Kentucky School for the Deaf
[Advisory ]Board, composed of nine (9) members appointed by the Kentucky
Board of Education upon recommendation of the chief state school officer.[ At the
first regular meeting in each fiscal year, the board shall elect a chairman and vice
chairman.] A member may serve no more than two (2) consecutive years as
chair[chairman]. Members shall be appointed for regular terms of four (4) years.[
Members of the board shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 1/28/2026 1:47 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1750
necessary expenses incurred in performance of their duties.]
(2) [Advisory ]Board members for the Kentucky School for the Deaf shall be selected
from nominations submitted by the Kentucky Association of the Deaf Inc., the
Parent-Teacher-Cottage Parent Association, the Kentucky School for the Deaf
Alumni Association Inc., the Kentucky Association of School Administrators, and
the chief state school officer. A majority of the board's membership shall be
persons who are deaf or hard of hearing. Membership on the board shall be
statewide and shall consist of:
(a) Two (2) parents of deaf children;[,]
(b) One (1) professional in education of the deaf;[,]
(c) One (1) former student of the Kentucky School for the Deaf;[,]
(d) One (1) member of the Kentucky Association for the Deaf;[,]
(e) Two (2) members who shall represent school districts;[,] and
(f) Two (2) members at large[. A majority of the board's membership shall be
persons who are deaf or hard of hearing].
(3) The board shall direct the work of and[act in an advisory capacity to] assist the
school superintendent in conducting the activities of the school. The board shall
develop and adopt policies, not inconsistent with the policies and administrative
regulations of the Kentucky Board of Education, by which the superintendent of
the Kentucky School for the Deaf shall be governed in planning, coordinating,
administering, supervising, operating, and evaluating the educational programs,
services, and activities of the Kentucky School for the Deaf which are within the
jurisdiction of the board. The board shall also make recommendations to the chief
state school officer concerning all areas relating to the effective operation of the
school, including but not limited to:
(a) Goals and objectives,
(b) Budget requests,
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 1/28/2026 1:47 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1750
(c) Student services,
(d) Public relations,
(e) Construction and maintenance, and
(f) Program evaluation.
(4) (a) A vacancy in the membership of the board shall be filled in the same
manner as the initial appointment and shall serve for the remainder of the
unexpired term.
(b) At the first regular meeting of the board in each fiscal year, a chair and vice
chair shall be elected from the board membership.
(c) The members shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses
incurred in the performance of their duties.
(5) The Kentucky School for the Deaf Board shall be attached to the Kentucky
Department of Education for administrative purposes.
Section 3. KRS 167.170 is amended to read as follows:
The Kentucky Board of Education shall [alone ]have the power to expel a pupil from the
Kentucky School for the Blind or the Kentucky School for the Deaf. The board may
delegate that power to a three (3) member panel of the board. However, the board may
delegate the power to expel a pupil from the Kentucky School for the Deaf to the
Kentucky School for the Deaf Board.
Section 4. Notwithstanding the appointment schedule and terms of members of
the Kentucky School for the Deaf Board, the Kentucky Board of Education shall appoint
the members of the Kentucky School for the Deaf advisory board to their equivalent
membership position on the Kentucky School for the Deaf Board. Members appointed
pursuant to this section shall serve a term equivalent to the remainder of their unexpired
term as a member of the Kentucky School for the Deaf advisory board.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 1/28/2026 1:47 PM Jacketed